Florida, session 2026, HB1539.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 790.402, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
790.402 Blood testing required following civilian-involved
shootings.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Civilian" means an individual who is not acting in an
official capacity as a law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, correctional probation officer, as those terms are
defined in s. 943.10, or member of the armed forces at the time
of the incident.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1539 2026
(b) "Civilian-involved shooting" means an incident within
this state in which a civilian discharges a firearm, whether
intentionally or unintentionally, resulting in injury or death
to any person.
(2) TESTING REQUIREMENT.—If a civilian discharges a
firearm within this state resulting in an injury or a death,
such individual must submit to a test of his or her blood within
2 hours after the incident for the purpose of determining the
alcohol content thereof or the presence of chemical substances
as set forth in s. 877.111 or any substance controlled under
chapter 893.
(3) PROCEDURE.—
(a) The test must be administered by a qualified medical
professional at the direction of a law enforcement officer or an
independent investigator assigned by the Department of Law
Enforcement.
(b) The blood sample must be analyzed by a state-certified
laboratory, and the results must be provided to the
investigating agency and to the Department of Law Enforcement.
(c) Refusal to submit to testing pursuant to this section
constitutes grounds for administrative or criminal penalties,
and such refusal is deemed a waiver of a claim of self-defense
in any subsequent criminal or civil proceedings arising from the
incident.
(4) CONFIDENTIALITY AND DISCLOSURE.—Test results obtained
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1539 2026
pursuant to this section must be treated as part of the official
investigative record and maintained in accordance with chapter
119. Results may be disclosed upon conclusion of the
investigation unless otherwise prohibited by law or court order.
(5) REPORTING.—The Department of Law Enforcement shall
submit an annual report by June 30 of each year to the Governor,
the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives which includes all of the following information:
(a) The number of civilian-involved shooting incidents and
the number of those individuals that submitted to the requiring
testing pursuant to this section.
(b) Aggregate data on testing results and any related
prosecutorial or disciplinary actions.
(c) Recommendations for policy or procedural improvements
to enhance firearm safety, transparency, and community
accountability.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1539-00